pt-BR: Guitarra corda calibre tipo: Barítono; Leve personalizada; Extra leve; Pesada; Leve; Média-leve; Média; Outra
ru: Тип калибра гитарных струн: Баритон; Специальное легкое; Экстра-легкое; Тяжелое; Легкое; Легко-среднее; Среднее; Другое
th: ประเภทของขนาดสายกีตาร์: บาริโทน; คัสตอมไลต์; เอ็กซ์ตร้าไลต์; เฮฟวี; ไลต์; ไลต์-มีเดียม; มีเดียม; อื่นๆ
nl: Gitaarsnaar dikte type: Bariton; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Overig
sv: Typ av tjockleksmätare för gitarrsträng: Baryton; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Övrigt
zh-TW: 吉他弦線徑類型: 上低音; 客製化輕張力; 極輕張力; 重張力; 輕張力; 輕中張力; 中張力; 其他
da: Type af strengtykkelse til guitar: Baryton; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Andet
sk-SK: Typ hrúbky strún na gitaru: Barytónové; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Iné
fi: Kitaran kielten paksuus: Baritoni; Custom light; Erittäin kevyt; Raskas; Kevyt; Kevyt–keskiraskas; Keskiraskas; Muu
vi: Loại cỡ dây đàn guitar: Baritone; Mỏng tùy chỉnh; Siêu mỏng; Dày; Mỏng; Mỏng-trung bình; Trung bình; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta mjerača niza za gitaru: Bariton; Custom tanke; Ekstra tanke; Debele; Tanke; Srednje tanke; Srednje; Ostalo
ko: 기타 스트링 게이지 유형: 바리톤; 커스텀 라이트; 엑스트라 라이트; 헤비; 라이트; 라이트 미디엄; 미디엄; 기타
tr: Gitar tel kalınlık tipi: Bariton; Özel hafif; Ekstra hafif; Ağır; Hafif; Hafif-orta; Orta; Diğer
es: Tipo de calibre de cuerdas de guitarra: Barítono; Ligero personalizado; Extra ligero; Grueso; Ligero; Ligero-medio; Medio; Otro
it: Tipo di calibro delle corde della chitarra: Baritono; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Altro
zh-CN: 吉他琴弦规格类型: 上低音; 定制细; 特细; 粗; 细; 中细; 中等; 其他
pl: Typ grubości strun gitarowych: Barytonowe; Niestandardowe lekkie; Bardzo lekkie; Ciężkie; Lekkie; Lekkie-średnie; Średnie; Inne
ja: ギターストリングゲージタイプ: バリトン; カスタムライト; エクストラライト; ヘビー; ライト; ライトミディアム; ミディアム; その他
bg-BG: Тип дебелина на струните за китара: Баритон; Персонализирани леки; Супер леки; Тежки; Леки; Леки към средни; Средни; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta debeline kitarskih strun: Baritonska; Prilagojeno tanka; Izjemno tanka; Debela; Tanka; Tanko-srednja; Srednja; Drugo
nb: Gitarstyrkemålertype: Baryton; Tilpasset lett; Ekstra lett; Tung; Lett; Lett-medium; Medium; Annet
fr: Type de tirant des cordes de guitare: Baryton; Léger personnalisé; Extra léger; Fort; Léger; Moyen-léger; Moyen; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de calibre de guitarra cadeia: Barítono; Leve personalizada; Extra leve; Pesada; Leve; Leve-média; Média; Outro
cs: Typ měření tloušťky kytarových strun: Barytonové; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Jiné
el: Τύπος πάχους χορδών κιθάρας: Βαρύτονο; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Άλλο
hu: A gitárhúrok vastagsága: Bariton; Egyedi vékony; Extra vékony; Vastag; Vékony; Vékony-közepes; Közepes; Egyéb
en: Guitar string gauge type: Baritone; Custom light; Extra light; Heavy; Light; Light-medium; Medium; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de calibru al chitarei: Bariton; Subțiri personalizate; Extra subțiri; Groase; Subțiri; Subțiri-medii; Medii; Altele
lt-LT: Gitaros stygų storio tipas: Baritono; „Custom light“; Ypač plonos („Extra light“); Storos („Heavy“); Plonos („Light“); Vidutinio plonumo („Light-medium“); Vidutinės („Medium“); Kita
de: Typ der Gitarrensaitenstärke: Bariton; Custom Light; Extra Light; Heavy; Light; Light-Medium; Medium; Sonstige